Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 14. Safety Belt Usage

Public information program. —

Laws 1989, ch. 274, § 2, provides: “To the extent federal funds are available for that purpose, the highway department shall develop a program of public information to inform Wyoming citizens about the requirements of this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Failure to use or misuse of automobile child safety seat or restraint system as affecting recovery for personal injury or death, 46 ALR5th 557.

Liability under state law for injuries resulting from defective automobile seatbelt, shoulder harness, or restraint system, 48 ALR5th 1.

Nonuse of seatbelt as reducing amount of damages recoverable, 62 ALR5th 537.

§ 31-5-1401.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Emergency vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-5-1302(a)(iii);

“Passenger vehicle” means a vehicle which is self-propelled and designed to carry eleven (11) persons or less and primarily used to transport persons, including autocycles and pickup trucks but excluding emergency vehicles, motorcycles and buses;

“Police officer” means as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xxxiii);

“Safety belt” means a passenger restraint which was installed when the vehicle was manufactured;

“Vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(lviii);

“This act” means W.S.

31-5-1401

and

31-5-1402

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 274, § 1; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

in (a)(ii),added “autocycles and” to the definition of “Passenger vehicle”.

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-5-1402.
Safety belts required to be used; exceptions; reduction in fine.

Each driver and passenger of a motor vehicle operated in this state shall wear, and each driver of a motor vehicle shall require that a passenger under twelve (12) years of age shall wear, a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt when the motor vehicle is in motion on public streets and highways.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to:

Any person who has a written statement from a physician that it is not advisable for the person to wear a safety belt for physical or medical reasons;

Any passenger vehicle which is not required to be equipped with safety belts under federal law;

A carrier of the United States postal service performing duties as a postal carrier;

Any person properly secured in a child safety restraint system in accordance with W.S.

31-5-1301

through

31-5-1305

; or

Any person occupying a seat in a vehicle in which all operable safety restraints are being used by the driver or passengers and any person occupying a seat in a vehicle originally manufactured without a safety belt.

No violation of this section shall:

Be counted as a moving violation for the purpose of suspending a driver’s license under W.S.

31-7-129

;

Be grounds for increasing insurance premiums or made a part of the abstracts kept by the department pursuant to W.S.

31-5-1214

.

No motor vehicle shall be halted solely for a violation of this section.

All citations for violations of the motor vehicle laws of this state and for violations of traffic ordinances or traffic regulations of a local authority shall contain a notation by the issuing officer indicating whether the driver and passengers complied with this section. Compliance with this section shall entitle a licensee to a ten dollar ($10.00) reduction in the fine otherwise imposed by any court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. The driver who violates this section may be issued a citation and may be subject to a fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Any passenger who violates this section may be issued a citation and may be subject to a fine of not more than ten dollars ($10.00).

Evidence of a person’s failure to wear a safety belt as required by this act shall not be admissible in any civil action.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 274, § 1; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 1991, ch. 39, § 1; 2000, ch. 101, § 1; 2003, ch. 136, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (f), see § 31-5-1401(a)(vi).

Constitutionality. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f) is not unconstitutional. It does not violate the separation of powers doctrine because, as a substantive law, its enactment was inherently within the powers delegated to the legislature by the Wyoming Constitution, and it does not violate the equal protection clauses of either the United States nor the Wyoming Constitution because, under rational basis review, it is conceivable that § 31-5-1402(f) serves the purposes for which it was enacted, to encourage seat belt use while limiting the penalties for seat belt nonuse. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Common-law duty to use seat belts. —

There is a duty, based on the common-law standard of ordinary care, to use available seat belts independent of any statutory mandate. Dellapenta v. Dellapenta, 838 P.2d 1153,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1992).

Parents have duty to buckle seat belts of their minor passengers

who are dependent on adult care and supervision for their well being and safety. Dellapenta v. Dellapenta, 838 P.2d 1153,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1992).

Introduction of seat belt evidence. —

This section does not apply retroactively to prohibit the introduction of seat belt evidence in a case where the failure to use the seat belts occurred before the current statute. Dellapenta v. Dellapenta, 838 P.2d 1153,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1992).

In a case where the introduction of seat belt evidence is not prohibited, the introduction of evidence of seat belt nonuse is allowed where an offer of proof is made to show a causal relationship between nonuse and injuries to the occupant. Dellapenta v. Dellapenta, 838 P.2d 1153,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1992).

Court determined it should apply Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f), which prohibits the introduction of evidence of seat belt nonuse, in plaintiff's action against defendant, and therefore granted the plaintiff's motion in limine. The legislative intent of the provision was to bar the admission of evidence of nonuse of a safety belt in any civil action and in doing so, the legislature impliedly advanced the substantive principle that seat belt nonuse could not be used to establish comparative fault; therefore, standing alone, § 31-5-1402(f) has a nonprocedural purpose. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Relation to comparative fault statute. —

Court found no inconsistency in the application of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f), which prohibits the introduction of evidence of seat belt nonuse, in light of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-1-10; the legislature has the right to limit the application of comparative fault principles to negligence actions arising out of automobile accidents involving unbelted occupants. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Nonuse of seatbelt as reducing amount of damages coverable, 62 ALR5th 537.